Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. Compulsory School Attendance.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 23.

§ 22.1-254.
Compulsory attendance required; excuses and waivers; alternative education program attendance; exemptions from article.

As used in this subsection, “attend” includes participation in educational programs and courses at a site remote from the school with the permission of the school and in conformity with applicable requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, every parent, guardian, or other person in the Commonwealth having control or charge of any child who will have reached the fifth birthday on or before September 30 of any school year and who has not passed the eighteenth birthday shall, during the period of each year the public schools are in session and for the same number of days and hours per day as the public schools, cause such child to attend a public school or a private, denominational, or parochial school or have such child taught by a tutor or teacher of qualifications prescribed by the Board and approved by the division superintendent, or provide for home instruction of such child as described in § 22.1-254.1.

As prescribed in the regulations of the Board, the requirements of this section may also be satisfied by causing a child to attend an alternative program of study or work/study offered by a public, private, denominational, or parochial school or by a public or private degree-granting institution of higher education. Further, in the case of any five-year-old child who is subject to the provisions of this subsection, the requirements of this section may be alternatively satisfied by causing the child to attend any public educational pre-kindergarten program, including a Head Start program, or in a private, denominational, or parochial educational pre-kindergarten program.

Instruction in the home of a child or children by the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of such child or children shall not be classified or defined as a private, denominational or parochial school.

The requirements of this section shall apply to (i) any child in the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the Department of Corrections who has not passed his eighteenth birthday and (ii) any child whom the division superintendent has required to take a special program of prevention, intervention, or remediation as provided in subsection C of § 22.1-253.13:1 and in § 22.1-254.01. The requirements of this section shall not apply to (a) any person 16 through 18 years of age who is housed in an adult correctional facility when such person is actively pursuing the achievement of a passing score on a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board but is not enrolled in an individual student alternative education plan pursuant to subsection E, and (b) any child who has obtained a high school diploma or its equivalent, a certificate of completion, or has achieved a passing score on a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board, or who has otherwise complied with compulsory school attendance requirements as set forth in this article.

A school board shall excuse from attendance at school:

Any pupil who, together with his parents, by reason of bona fide religious training or belief is conscientiously opposed to attendance at school. For purposes of this subdivision, “bona fide religious training or belief” does not include essentially political, sociological or philosophical views or a merely personal moral code; and

On the recommendation of the juvenile and domestic relations district court of the county or city in which the pupil resides and for such period of time as the court deems appropriate, any pupil who, together with his parents, is opposed to attendance at a school by reason of concern for such pupil’s health, as verified by competent medical evidence, or by reason of such pupil’s reasonable apprehension for personal safety when such concern or apprehension in that pupil’s specific case is determined by the court, upon consideration of the recommendation of the principal and division superintendent, to be justified.

Each local school board shall develop policies for excusing students who are absent by reason of observance of a religious holiday. Such policies shall ensure that a student shall not be deprived of any award or of eligibility or opportunity to compete for any award, or of the right to take an alternate test or examination, for any which he missed by reason of such absence, if the absence is verified in a manner acceptable to the school board.

A school board may excuse from attendance at school:

On recommendation of the principal and the division superintendent and with the written consent of the parent or guardian, any pupil who the school board determines, in accordance with regulations of the Board, cannot benefit from education at such school; or

On recommendation of the juvenile and domestic relations district court of the county or city in which the pupil resides, any pupil who, in the judgment of such court, cannot benefit from education at such school.

Local school boards may allow the requirements of subsection A to be met under the following conditions:

For a student who is at least 16 years of age, there shall be a meeting of the student, the student’s parents, and the principal or his designee of the school in which the student is enrolled in which an individual student alternative education plan shall be developed in conformity with guidelines prescribed by the Board, which plan must include:

Career guidance counseling;

Mandatory enrollment and attendance in a preparatory program for passing a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board or other alternative education program approved by the local school board with attendance requirements that provide for reporting of student attendance by the chief administrator of such preparatory program or approved alternative education program to such principal or his designee;

Mandatory enrollment in a program to earn a Board-approved career and technical education credential, such as the successful completion of an industry certification, a state licensure examination, a national occupational competency assessment, the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery, or the Virginia workplace readiness skills assessment;

Successful completion of the course in economics and personal finance required to earn a Board-approved high school diploma;

Counseling on the economic impact of failing to complete high school; and

Procedures for reenrollment to comply with the requirements of subsection A.

A student for whom an individual student alternative education plan has been granted pursuant to this subsection and who fails to comply with the conditions of such plan shall be in violation of the compulsory school attendance law, and the division superintendent or attendance officer of the school division in which such student was last enrolled shall seek immediate compliance with the compulsory school attendance law as set forth in this article.

Students enrolled with an individual student alternative education plan shall be counted in the average daily membership of the school division.

A school board may, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Article 3 (§ 22.1-276.01 et seq.) of Chapter 14 and upon a finding that a school-age child has been (i) charged with an offense relating to the Commonwealth’s laws, or with a violation of school board policies, on weapons, alcohol or drugs, or intentional injury to another person; (ii) found guilty or not innocent of a crime that resulted in or could have resulted in injury to others, or of an offense that is required to be disclosed to the superintendent of the school division pursuant to subsection G of § 16.1-260; (iii) suspended pursuant to § 22.1-277.05; or (iv) expelled from school attendance pursuant to § 22.1-277.06 or 22.1-277.07 or subsection C of § 22.1-277, require the child to attend an alternative education program as provided in § 22.1-209.1:2 or 22.1-277.2:1.

Whenever a court orders any pupil into an alternative education program, including a program preparing students for a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board, offered in the public schools, the local school board of the school division in which the program is offered shall determine the appropriate alternative education placement of the pupil, regardless of whether the pupil attends the public schools it supervises or resides within its school division.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court of the county or city in which a pupil resides or in which charges are pending against a pupil, or any court in which charges are pending against a pupil, may require the pupil who has been charged with (i) a crime that resulted in or could have resulted in injury to others, (ii) a violation of Article 1 (§

18.2-77

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 18.2, or (iii) any offense related to possession or distribution of any Schedule I, II, or III controlled substances to attend an alternative education program, including, but not limited to, night school, adult education, or any other education program designed to offer instruction to students for whom the regular program of instruction may be inappropriate.

This subsection shall not be construed to limit the authority of school boards to expel, suspend, or exclude students, as provided in §§ 22.1-277.04, 22.1-277.05, 22.1-277.06, 22.1-277.07, and 22.1-277.2. As used in this subsection, the term “charged” means that a petition or warrant has been filed or is pending against a pupil.

Within one calendar month of the opening of school, each school board shall send to the parents or guardian of each student enrolled in the division a copy of the compulsory school attendance law and the enforcement procedures and policies established by the school board.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to:

Children suffering from contagious or infectious diseases while suffering from such diseases;

Children whose immunizations against communicable diseases have not been completed as provided in § 22.1-271.2;

Children under 10 years of age who live more than two miles from a public school unless public transportation is provided within one mile of the place where such children live;

Children between the ages of 10 and 17, inclusive, who live more than 2.5 miles from a public school unless public transportation is provided within 1.5 miles of the place where such children live; and

Children excused pursuant to subsections B and D.

Further, any child who will not have reached his sixth birthday on or before September 30 of each school year whose parent or guardian notifies the appropriate school board that he does not wish the child to attend school until the following year because the child, in the opinion of the parent or guardian, is not mentally, physically, or emotionally prepared to attend school, may delay the child’s attendance for one year.

The distances specified in subdivisions 3 and 4 shall be measured or determined from the child’s residence to the entrance to the school grounds or to the school bus stop nearest the entrance to the residence of such children by the nearest practical routes which are usable for walking or riding. Disease shall be established by the certificate of a reputable practicing physician in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.

Subject to guidelines established by the Department, any student who is absent from school due to his mental or behavioral health shall be granted an excused absence.

Subject to guidelines established by the Department, each school board (i) shall permit one school day-long excused absence per school year for any middle school or high school student in the local school division who is absent from school to engage in a civic event and (ii) may permit additional excused absences for such students who are absent for such purpose. Local school boards may require that the student provide advance notice of the intended absence and require that the student provide documentation of participation in a civic event.

Subject to guidelines established by the Department, any student who is a member of a state-recognized or federally recognized tribal nation that is headquartered in the Commonwealth and who is absent from school to attend such tribal nation’s pow wow gathering shall be granted one excused absence per academic year, provided that the parent of such student provides to the student’s school advance notice of such absence in the manner required by the school.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.1; 1952, c. 279; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1968, c. 178; 1974, c. 199; 1976, cc. 681, 713; 1978, c. 518; 1980, c. 559; 1984, c. 436; 1989, c. 515; 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295; 1993, c. 903; 1996, cc. 163, 916, 964; 1997, c. 828; 1999, cc. 488, 552; 2000, c. 184; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2003, c. 119; 2004, c. 251; 2006, c. 335; 2010, c. 605; 2012, cc. 454, 642; 2014, c. 84; 2017, c. 330; 2018, cc. 486, 585; 2020, c. 869; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 104, 105; 2022, c. 233.

Cross references.

As to kindergarten programs and ages of children eligible to enroll therein, see § 22.1-199.

As to participation in or eligibility for state-supported financial aid programs, see §

23.1-600

.

As to vaccination of children upon declaration of public health emergency involving vaccine-preventable disease, see §

32.1-47.1

.

As to conditions and requirements for licensure of persons under 18, see §

46.2-334

. As to requirements for a learner’s permit, see §

46.2-335

.

As to eligibility for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families of person under age 18 who is in compliance with compulsory school attendance laws, see §

63.2-602

.

As to eligibility for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families being conditioned on compliance with compulsory school attendance laws, see §

63.2-606

.

As to child support obligation of minor noncustodial parent who is not in compliance with compulsory school attendance laws and whose child receives TANF, see §

63.2-1912

.

For constitutional provision as to compulsory education, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 3.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 454 and 642, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall eliminate technical diplomas that have not been implemented and shall promulgate regulations to implement the other provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2016, c. 148, cl. 1 provides “§ 1. The Department of Education (Department) shall review regulations established pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., and § 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and suggest revisions to Department guidance documents on such federal regulations relating to a return to learn protocol for students who have been treated for pediatric cancer.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, subdivisions E a through f were redesignated as subdivisions E 1 through 6.

The second sentence of Acts 2020, c. 869 was codified as subsection J of this section, except that “, subject to such guidelines,” has been deleted. Acts 2020, c. 869 reads, in full: “The Department of Education shall establish and distribute to each school board no later than December 31, 2020, guidelines for the granting of an excused absence from school to a student due to his mental or behavioral health. Any student who is absent from school due to his mental or behavioral health shall be granted, subject to such guidelines, an excused absence.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 488 and 552 are identical, and added “Except as otherwise provided in this article” at the beginning of subsection A, deleted the paragraph designator B from the third paragraph; deleted former subsection C, which read: “The requirements of this section shall not apply to any child who has obtained a high school diploma, its equivalent, or a certificate of completion, or has otherwise complied with compulsory school attendance requirements as set forth in this article”; in the fourth paragraph, deleted the former paragraph designator D, inserted the clause (i) designator, and deleted “any child who may have been adjudicated as an adult, and who has not passed his eighteenth birthday” at the end of the paragraph; in the fifth paragraph, deleted the former paragraph designator E, substituted “Department of Corrections who has not passed his eighteenth birthday and (ii) any child whom” for “requirements of this section shall apply to any child whom,” and added the last sentence; added subsections B through F; substituted the former subsection F designator for G; and added subsection H.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 184 substituted the language beginning “in violation of the compulsory school attendance law” and ending “as set forth in this article” for “deemed to be in violation of subsection A of this section” at the end of the next-to-last paragraph of subsection D.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 688 and 820 are virtually identical, and rewrote subsection E, which formerly read: “A school board may, in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 22.1-277 and upon a finding that a school-age child has (i) committed an offense in violation of school board policies, (ii) been charged with an offense relating to the Commonwealth’s laws, or with a violation of school board policies, on weapons, alcohol or drugs, or intentional injury to another person, or (iii) been expelled from school attendance pursuant to § 22.1-277.01, require the child to attend an alternative education program as provided in § 22.1-209.1:2 or § 22.1-277.1”; and substituted “§§ 22.1-277.04, 22.1-277.05, 22.1-277.06, 22.1-277.07, and 22.1-277.2” for “§§ 22.1-277, 22.1-277.01” in the last paragraph of subsection F.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 119 substituted “16” for “sixteen” in subsection D; in clause E (ii), substituted “of an offense that” for “for which the disposition ordered by a court,” and “subsection G of § 16.1-260” for “§ 16.1-305.1;” substituted “10” for “ten” in subdivision H 3; and in subdivision H 4, substituted “10” for “ten,” and “17” for “seventeen.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 251 inserted “(a) be satisfied for those persons . . . pursuant to subsection D and (b)” in the last sentence of the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 335, in the fourth paragraph of subsection A, in the second sentence, deleted “However” preceding “The requirements” and inserted “not apply to”; in clause (a), substituted “any person” for “be satisfied for those persons,” “is housed in an adult” for “are housed in adult,” “facility” for “facilities,” “person is” for “persons are” and “is” for “are” preceding “not enrolled,”; in clause (b), deleted “not apply to” preceding “any child,” inserted “or a GED certificate” and made a related change; substituted “or” for “and” in subdivision C 1; and inserted “including a program of general educational development” in subsection F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 605 substituted “subsection E” for “subsection D” in the last sentence of the last paragraph in subsection A; added subsection C; redesignated former subsections C through H as subsections D through I; deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in two places in subsection E; and substituted “subsections B and D” for “subsections B and C of this section” at the end of subdivision I 5.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 454 and 642 are identical, and added subdivisions E c and E d; redesignated former subdivisions E c and E d as subdivisions E e and E f; and in subsection F, deleted “of this title” following “Article 3 (§ 22.1-276.01 et seq.) of Chapter 14” and substituted “pursuant to § 22.1-277.06 or 22.1-277.07” for “pursuant to § 22.1-277.06 or § 22.1-277.07” and “provided in § 22.1-209.1:2 or 22.1-277.2:1” for “provided in § 22.1-209.1:2 or § 22.1-277.2:1.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in subsection A, in the fourth paragraph, clause (a), substituted “the achievement of a passing score on a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “a general educational development (GED) certificate”; in clause (b), substituted “has achieved a passing score on a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “a GED certificate”; in subdivision E b, deleted “general educational development” following “attendance in a” and “GED” following “administrator of such” and inserted “for passing a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education”; and in subsection G, substituted “preparing students for a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “of general educational development.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 330, in subdivision E 3, inserted “the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 486, in subsection A, inserted the first paragraph, substituted “cause such child to attend a public school or” for “send such child to a public school or to” in the second paragraph, and in the third paragraph, substituted “causing a child to attend” for “sending a child to” and “causing the child to attend” for “sending the child to.”

The 2018 amendment by c. 585 substituted “subsection C of § 22.1-277” for “subsection B of § 22.1-277” in subsection F.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 104 and 105, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the last paragraph of subsection I, deleted “of this subdivision” following “subdivisions 3 and 4”; and added subsection K.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 233 in subsections A, G, and I and subdivisions D 1 and E 2, deleted “of Education” following “Board” throughout; in subdivisions E 3 and 4, substituted “Board-approved” for “Board of Education-approved”; and in subsection J and K, deleted “of Education” following “Education”; and added subsection L.

Law Review.

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-3005 Order Vacating Plea of Guilty (Court Not of Record).

§ 22.1-254.01.
Certain students required to attend summer school or after-school sessions.

The division superintendent may seek immediate compliance with the compulsory school attendance law as set forth in § 22.1-254 after a reasonable effort to seek the student’s attendance in the summer school program or after-school session has failed, including direct notification of the parents of such student of the attendance requirement and failure of the parents to secure the student’s attendance, when:

A student is required to take a special program of prevention, intervention, or remediation in a public summer school program or to participate in another form of remediation as provided in subsection C of § 22.1-253.13:1 and in accordance with clause (ii) of subsection A of § 22.1-254; and

The division superintendent determines that remediation of the student’s poor academic performance, passage of the Standards of Learning Assessment in grades three through eight, or promotion is related directly to the student’s attendance in the summer school program or participation in another form of remediation.

History.

1996, c. 163; 1997, cc. 466, 828; 1998, cc. 602, 627, 902; 1999, cc. 488, 552; 2006, cc. 41, 834.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by cc. 602, effective July 1, 2003, deleted “passage of the literacy passport test” following “student’s poor academic performance.”

The 1998 amendment by c. 627, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “Standards of Learning Assessments” for “literacy passport test.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 488 and 552 are identical, and substituted “clause (ii) of subsection A” for “subsection E.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 41 and 834 are identical, and rewrote the first paragraph and added subdivisions 1 and 2.

§ 22.1-254.02.
Students transferring from a public school.

When a student transfers from a school division, such school division to the extent practicable, shall obtain written or electronic documentation of such transfer, in order to make an informed status classification of such student in an information management system prescribed by the Board of Education.

History.

2008, c. 422.

§ 22.1-254.1.
Declaration of policy; requirements for home instruction of children.

When the requirements of this section have been satisfied, instruction of children by their parents is an acceptable alternative form of education under the policy of the Commonwealth of Virginia. Any parent of any child who will have reached the fifth birthday on or before September 30 of any school year and who has not passed the eighteenth birthday may elect to provide home instruction in lieu of school attendance if he (i) holds a high school diploma; (ii) is a teacher of qualifications prescribed by the Board; (iii) provides the child with a program of study or curriculum, which may be delivered through a correspondence course or distance learning program or in any other manner; or (iv) provides evidence that he is able to provide an adequate education for the child.

Any parent who elects to provide home instruction in lieu of school attendance shall annually notify the division superintendent in August of his intention to so instruct the child and provide a description of the curriculum, limited to a list of subjects to be studied during the coming year, and evidence of having met one of the criteria for providing home instruction as required by subsection A. Parents electing to provide home instruction shall provide such annual notice no later than August 15. Any parent who moves into a school division or begins home instruction after the school year has begun shall notify the division superintendent of his intention to provide home instruction as soon as practicable and shall thereafter comply with the requirements of this section within 30 days of such notice. The division superintendent shall notify the Superintendent of the number of students in the school division receiving home instruction.

The parent who elects to provide home instruction shall provide the division superintendent by August 1 following the school year in which the child has received home instruction with either (i) evidence that the child has attained a composite score in or above the fourth stanine on any nationally normed standardized achievement test, or an equivalent score on the ACT, SAT, or PSAT test or (ii) an evaluation or assessment that the division superintendent determines to indicate that the child is achieving an adequate level of educational growth and progress, including (a) an evaluation letter from a person licensed to teach in any state, or a person with a master’s degree or higher in an academic discipline, having knowledge of the child’s academic progress, stating that the child is achieving an adequate level of educational growth and progress or (b) a report card or transcript from an institution of higher education, college distance learning program, or home-education correspondence school.

In the event that evidence of progress as required in this subsection is not provided by the parent, the home instruction program for that child may be placed on probation for one year. Parents shall file with the division superintendent evidence of their ability to provide an adequate education for their child in compliance with subsection A and a remediation plan for the probationary year that indicates their program is designed to address any educational deficiency. Upon acceptance of such evidence and plan by the division superintendent, the home instruction may continue for one probationary year. If the remediation plan and evidence are not accepted or the required evidence of progress is not provided by August 1 following the probationary year, home instruction shall cease and the parent shall make other arrangements for the education of the child that comply with § 22.1-254. The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to children who are under the age of six as of September 30 of the school year.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a pupil and his parents from obtaining an excuse from school attendance by reason of bona fide religious training or belief pursuant to subdivision B 1 of § 22.1-254.

Any party aggrieved by a decision of the division superintendent may appeal his decision within 30 days to an independent hearing officer. The independent hearing officer shall be chosen from the list maintained by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court for hearing appeals of the placements of children with disabilities. The costs of the hearing shall be apportioned among the parties by the hearing officer in a manner consistent with his findings.

School boards shall make Advanced Placement (AP), Preliminary SAT/National Merit Scholarship Qualifying Test (PSAT/NMSQT), and PreACT examinations available to students receiving home instruction pursuant to this section. School boards shall adopt written policies that specify the date by which such students shall register to participate in such examinations. School boards shall notify such students and their parents of such registration deadline and the availability of financial assistance to low-income and needy students to take such examinations.

No division superintendent or local school board shall disclose to the Department or any other person or entity outside of the local school division information that is provided by a parent or student to satisfy the requirements of this section or subdivision B 1 of § 22.1-254. However, a division superintendent or local school board may disclose, with the written consent of a student’s parent, such information to the extent provided by the parent’s consent. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a division superintendent from notifying the Superintendent of the number of students in the school division receiving home instruction as required by subsection B.

History.

1984, c. 436; 1986, c. 215; 1991, c. 306; 1992, c. 131; 1993, c. 992; 1994, c. 854; 1998, c. 435; 1999, cc. 488, 552; 2005, c. 377; 2006, cc. 562, 567, 911, 932; 2008, cc. 364, 553; 2012, cc. 547, 587; 2015, cc. 567, 590, 592; 2016, c. 640; 2017, cc. 302, 334; 2018, c. 516; 2022, c. 355.

Cross references.

As to participation in or eligibility for state-supported financial aid programs, see §

23.1-600

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts
2016, c. 588: in subsection C, substituted “an institution of higher education” for “a community college or college” in clause (b); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 488 and 552 are identical, and added the second sentence in subsection B, and substituted “§ 22.1-254 B 1” for “§ 22.1-257” at the end of the second paragraph of subsection D.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 377 deleted “of this section” in subsection B and in the second paragraph of subsection C; deleted the first paragraph of subsection D, which formerly read: “For purposes of this section, ‘parent’ means the biological parent or adoptive parent, guardian or other person having control or charge of a child” and
redesignated the former second paragraph as subsection D; added subsection F; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by c. 562 substituted “or” for “and” near the end of subsection A; inserted “thereafter” preceding “shall” in subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “any nationally normed standardized achievement test” for “a battery of achievement tests which have been approved by the Board of Education for use in the public schools” at the end of clause (i), deleted “in the judgment of” preceding “the division superintendent,” substituted “determines to indicate” for “indicates” following “the division superintendent” in clause (ii); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendment by c. 567 added the last sentence of subsection F.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 911 and 932 are identical, and substituted “high school diploma” for “baccalaureate degree in any subject from an accredited institution of higher education” in clause (i) of the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 364, in subsection A, substituted clauses (iii) and (iv) for “(iii) has enrolled the child or children in a correspondence course approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or (iv) provides a program of study or curriculum which, in the judgment of the division superintendent, includes the standards of learning objectives adopted by the Board of Education for language arts and mathematics or provides evidence that the parent is able to provide an adequate education for the child.”

The 2008 amendment by c. 553, in subsection C, inserted “including but not limited to” at the end of clause (ii) and added clauses (a) and (b).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 547 and 587 are nearly identical, and substituted “limited to a list of subjects to be studied during the coming year” for “limited to a list of subjects to be followed for the coming year” near the beginning of subsection B. In addition, Acts 2012, c. 547 added commas around the same clause.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 567 and 590 are identical, and inserted “or an equivalent score on the ACT, SAT, or PSAT test” in the first paragraph of subsection C.

The 2015 amendment by c. 592 substituted “SAT” for “Scholastic Aptitude Test” in subsection F and added subsection G.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 640, inserted the second sentence in subsection G.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 302 and 334 are identical, and rewrote subsection F, which formerly read: “School boards shall implement a plan to notify students receiving home instruction pursuant to this section and their parents of the availability of Advanced Placement (AP) and Preliminary SAT (PSAT) examinations and the availability of financial assistance to low-income and needy students to take these examinations. School boards shall implement a plan to make these examinations available to students receiving home instruction.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 516 inserted “the child with” preceding “a program of study” in clause (iii) of subsection A; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted “of Education” following “Board” in subsection A in clause (ii); in subsection B, deleted “Effective July 1, 2000” in the second sentence at the beginning and “of Public Instruction” following “Superintendent”; deleted “but not limited to” preceding clause (a) in subsection C; in subsection G, deleted “of Education” following “Department” and “of Public Instruction” following “Superintendent”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, §§ 1, 23.